Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 9 Children
11-9-15.
Tattooing of minors.

Every person who shall tattoo any minor under the age of eighteen (18), except in accordance with subsection (b) for medical purposes, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be imprisoned not exceeding one year or be fined not exceeding three hundred dollars ($300). For the purposes of this section, “tattooing” means the practice of marking the skin with indelible patterns or pictures by making punctures and inserting pigments. Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting the removal of tattoo markings from the body of any person of whatsoever age.

Every person who shall tattoo the body of a minor under the age of eighteen (18), for medical purposes, the following shall apply:

The minor child shall be accompanied by his or her parent or legal guardian;

The minor child and his or her parent or legal guardian shall each submit proof of his or her identity by producing a government-issued photo identification;

The parent or legal guardian shall submit his or her written notarized consent in the format prescribed by the department;

The parent or legal guardian shall submit proof that he or she is the parent or legal guardian of the minor child;

The parent or legal guardian shall submit notarized consent by a physician licensed in accordance with chapter 5-37, authorizing the tattooing of a minor child for medical purposes;

The tattooing is performed by a tattoo artist licensed in accordance with §

23-1-39

; and

The tattoo artist shall maintain all necessary records in a manner specified by the department.

Every person who tattoos the body of a minor child younger than eighteen (18) years of age may not violate the provisions of this section, if:

The person carefully inspects what appears to be a government-issued photo identification that represents that the minor child is eighteen (18) years of age or older.

The minor child falsely represents himself or herself as being eighteen (18) years of age or older and presents a fraudulent identification.

The person demonstrates clear and convincing standards in reviewing the authenticity of the documents, notarized consent and identification submitted in accordance with subsection (b).

Any person who violates the provisions of this chapter shall, upon a first conviction, be deemed guilty of a violation and fined not more than three hundred dollars ($300), and upon a second or subsequent conviction, shall be deemed guilty of a petty misdemeanor and fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

The director of the department of health shall have the following powers and duties:

To promulgate regulations relative to administering this section; and

To create all necessary applications and certificates necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 399, § 45; P.L. 1932, ch. 1922, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 610, § 45; P.L. 1956, ch. 3713, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-9-15

; P.L. 2013, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 197, § 1.

11-9-16.
Plastic bags — Labeling.

“Plastic bag” means a polyethylene bag, other than one used for food products weighing not more than five (5) pounds, intended for household use or for packaging articles intended for household use, which is larger than five inches (5") in diameter at the opened end, and is made of thin film less than one mil (0.001 inch) in thickness (according to standards established under the commodity standards division of the United States Department of Commerce).

No person shall package, deliver or sell any article for use in or around the household in a plastic bag, or shall sell or distribute any plastic bag for use in or around the household, unless the bag bears a warning against the hazard of suffocation by children in the following or substantially equivalent wording:

“Keep from children — may cause suffocation”

“WARNING: Keep this bag away from babies and children. Do not use in cribs, beds, carriages, or playpens. The thin film may cling to nose and mouth and prevent breathing.”

The warning shall be printed on, attached to, or accompany each bag; provided, that it shall be permissible to print the warning on the outside wrapper of packages of bags intended only for home processing use, such as freezer bags and garbage disposal bags, in lieu of on each individual bag. The warning shall be conspicuously displayed in bold face type, in accordance with the following table:

Any person who shall violate the provisions of this section shall upon conviction be fined not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100).

Total of the length and width of the bag, combined Font Size 60 inches or more 24 points 40 inches, but less than 60 inches 18 points 30 inches, but less than 40 inches 14 points Less than 30 inches 10 points

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1959, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 1960, ch. 171, § 1.

11-9-17.
Sterilization.

Every person who performs or aids and abets in the performance of a sterilization procedure on any person under the age of eighteen (18), unless the sterilization is incidental to, or is rendered necessary or unavoidable by, some other medical treatment or procedure required to preserve the life or health of that person, shall be guilty of a felony punishable by up to five (5) years imprisonment and a fine of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 187, § 1.

11-9-18.
Care of babies born alive during attempted abortions.

Any physician, nurse, or other licensed medical person who knowingly and intentionally fails to provide reasonable medical care and treatment to an infant born alive in the course of an abortion shall be guilty of a felony and upon conviction shall be fined not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or imprisoned not exceeding five (5) years, or both. Any physician, nurse, or other licensed medical person who knowingly and intentionally fails to provide reasonable medical care and treatment to an infant born alive in the course of an abortion, and, as a result of that failure, the infant dies, shall be guilty of the crime of manslaughter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 280, § 1.

11-9-19.
Sale of spray paint to minors.

No person shall knowingly sell to any child under eighteen (18) years of age any aerosol container of paint capable of defacing property.

For purposes of this section, bona fide evidence of majority, identity of majority and identity of the person is a document issued by a federal, state, county, or municipal government, or subdivision or agency of them, including, but not limited to, a motor vehicle operator’s license, a registration certificate issued under the federal Selective Service Act, 50 App. U.S.C. § 451 et seq., or an identification card issued to a member of the armed forces.

Proof that the defendant, or his employee or agent, demanded, was shown and acted in reliance upon bona fide evidence in any sale transaction forbidden by subsection (a) of this section, shall be a defense to any criminal prosecution for that violation.

Any person who owns, manages or operates a place of business where aerosol containers of paint capable of defacing property are sold shall conspicuously post notice of this law in the place of business in letters at least three-eighths of an inch (3/8") high.

Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 394, § 1.

11-9-19.1.
Possession of spray paint by a minor.

No person under the age of eighteen (18) years shall have in his or her possession or under his or her control any aerosol container of spray paint. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be subject to a requirement of up to fifty (50) hours of community restitution work.

Subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to possession or use of aerosol spray paint containers on property owned or rented by the minor or his or her parent(s) or guardian(s).

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 361, § 1.

11-9-20.
Sale of matches.

No person, firm or corporation that owns, manages or operates a place of business including vending machines shall knowingly sell, give or deliver matches to any child under the age of twelve (12) years. The owner, operator or manager of a place of business where matches are sold shall post a notice of this law conspicuously in the place of business in letters at least three-eighths of an inch (3/8") high. Signs required by this section may be provided, at cost, by the department of health.

Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be fined one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 159, § 2.

11-9-21.
Prohibition of sale of certain dietary supplements to minors.

It shall be a misdemeanor for any manufacturer, wholesaler, retailer, or other person, to sell, transfer, or otherwise furnish any of the following to a person under 18 years of age:

A dietary supplement containing an ephedrine group alkaloid.

A dietary supplement containing any of the following:

Androstanedoil.

Androstanedione.

Androstenedione.

Noradrostenediol.

Norandrostenedione.

Dehydroepiandrosterone.

The seller shall request valid identification from any individual who attempts to purchase a dietary supplement set forth in subsection (a) if that individual reasonably appears to the seller to be under 18 years of age.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b), a retail clerk who fails to request identification pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall not be guilty of a misdemeanor, subject to any civil penalties, or subject to any disciplinary action or discharge by his or her employer.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 244, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 246, § 2.